Florida, session 2026, HB89.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 474.224, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
474.224 Veterinary prescription disclosure.—
(1)(a) Before dispensing a prescription medication, a
licensed veterinarian or an authorized member of the veterinary
staff must clearly inform a client of:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb89 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 89 2026 Legislature
1. The client's right to receive a written prescription
for the medication that can be filled at the pharmacy of the
client's choice.
2. If the veterinary establishment is able to fill the
prescription, the option to have the prescription filled at the
veterinary establishment.

For purposes of this chapter, "written prescription" may include
paper prescriptions via manual transmission or electronic
prescriptions via direct transmission to a pharmacy.
(b) Each disclosure required under this subsection shall
be made:
1. Verbally, if the consultation with the client is in
person; or
2. Electronically, if the consultation with the client is
through veterinary telehealth.
(c) The option chosen by the client under paragraph (a)
must be documented by the veterinarian or an authorized member
of the veterinary staff with a one-time acknowledgement that is
signed by the client and that states that the client is aware of
the options in paragraph (a).
1. The acknowledgement must be in substantially the
following form:

ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF ABILITY TO
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb89 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 89 2026 Legislature
RECEIVE WRITTEN PRESCRIPTION
"I, (name of client), understand the veterinary client's
right to receive a written prescription for the medication
that can be filled by the pharmacy of my choice or my
veterinarian, as provided in s. 474.224, Florida Statutes."

Signature: (signature of applicant) Date:
(date)

2. An acknowledgment signed by a client under this section
shall be documented in the patient's medical record.
3. An acknowledgement under this section may not make a
statement, notification, warning, or assumption regarding the
efficacy or safety of filling prescriptions through an outside
pharmacy.
(d) A veterinary establishment shall post a clear and
conspicuous sign near the point of sale or where checkout occurs
which substantially states the following:

"FLORIDA LAW GIVES THE VETERINARY CLIENT THE OPTION TO:
1. RECEIVE A WRITTEN PRESCRIPTION FOR MEDICATION THAT CAN
BE FILLED AT THE PHARMACY OF YOUR CHOICE; OR
2. HAVE YOUR PRESCRIPTION FILLED AT THE VETERINARY
ESTABLISHMENT, IF THE VETERINARY ESTABLISHMENT IS ABLE TO
FILL THE PRESCRIPTION."
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb89 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 89 2026 Legislature

(2) This section does not apply if:
(a) Immediate dispensing of medication is necessary to
preserve life or prevent suffering; or
(b) The prescription is for a controlled substance, the
dispensing of which is restricted by federal or state law.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb89 -02-er